California statutes. Public Utilities Code
Unless the context requires otherwise, for purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Inspector General” means the High-Speed Rail Authority Inspector General appointed pursuant to Section 187020.

(b) “Merced to Bakersfield segment” means a 171-mile electrified dual-track segment that is usable for high-speed rail service in the central valley from Merced to Bakersfield, with a new combined station in downtown Merced, and connections to the Amtrak San Joaquins and the Altamont Corridor Express.

(c) “Office” means the High-Speed Rail Authority Office of the Inspector General established pursuant to Section 187020.

(d) “Personnel issues” means matters specific to the employment relationship between the High-Speed Rail Authority and its employees, including, but not limited to, hiring and promotional decisions, performance reviews, progressive discipline, adverse actions, grievances, merit issue complaints, workplace harassment, discrimination, or possible wage or supply theft having an immaterial effect, as determined by the Inspector General, on the planning, delivery, and operation of the project. For purposes of this division, “personnel issues” does not mean fraud, waste, abuse, or mismanagement by the High-Speed Rail Authority or its employees having a material effect, as determined by the Inspector General, on the planning, delivery, and operation of the project.

(e) “Project” means the high-speed rail project undertaken by the High-Speed Rail Authority pursuant to Division 19 (commencing with Section 185000) of this code and Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 2704) and Chapter 20.5 (commencing with Section 2704.75) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 53, Sec. 7.   (AB 173)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The High-Speed Rail Authority Office of Inspector General [187020. - 187024.]

187020.

(a) (1) There is hereby created the High-Speed Rail Authority Office of the Inspector General.

(2) The Governor shall appoint the High-Speed Rail Authority Inspector General to a four-year term from a list of three qualified individuals nominated by the Joint Legislative Audit Committee. The Joint Legislative Audit Committee shall select the three qualified individuals from a pool of candidates after conducting a comprehensive search for qualified individuals. The Joint Legislative Audit Committee shall provide at least 120 days’ notice that it is seeking applicants for nomination by providing notice in the Journals of the Senate and the Assembly and by advertising in appropriate newspapers and with nationally
 acknowledged professional journals and associations. Names for consideration by the Joint Legislative Audit Committee may be submitted by members of the Legislature, professional organizations, individuals, and other entities. The Inspector General shall be chosen without reference to party affiliation and solely on the ground of fitness to perform the duties of the High-Speed Rail Authority Inspector General.

(3) The Legislature and the Governor may provide suggested qualifications to the Joint Legislative Audit Committee to consider when making its nominations.

(b) The Office of the Inspector General shall not be a subdivision of any other governmental entity.

(c) The Inspector General may not be removed from office by the Governor during that term, except for good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 10.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

187022.

(a) In coordination with the High-Speed Rail Authority, the Inspector General shall be provided with appropriate and adequate office space at the High-Speed Rail Authority’s offices or other facilities as necessary, together with such equipment, office supplies, maintenance services, and communications facilities and services as may be necessary for the operation of the Inspector General’s offices.

(b) For each fiscal year, the Inspector General shall provide the Department of Finance with the office’s proposed budget by September 1 of each year. If the
 Department of Finance makes any position or funding changes to the Inspector General’s proposed budget, including, but not limited to, modifications related to total funding amounts in the budget year and out-years, staff classifications, limited-term versus permanent positions, contract resources, and operating expenses and equipment, the Department of Finance shall provide a notification to the chairs and vice chairs of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office identifying the differences and explaining the reasons for the differences. This notification shall be provided no later than January 10 of each year.

(c) The annual salary for the Inspector General shall be equal to that of the Inspector General of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation established pursuant to Chapter 8.2 (commencing with Section 6125) of Title 7 of Part 3 of the
 Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 53, Sec. 8.   (AB 173)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

187024.

Subject to applicable law, the Inspector General shall select, appoint, and employ officers and employees necessary to carry out the functions of the office. In making these selections, the Inspector General shall ensure that those officers and employees have the requisite training and experience to enable the Inspector General to carry out their duties effectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 10.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Responsibilities of the High-Speed Rail Authority Inspector General [187030. - 187038.]

187030.

(a) The Inspector General may, under policies developed by the Inspector General, initiate an audit or review on the Inspector General’s own accord regarding oversight related to delivery of the project, and the selection and oversight of contractors related to the project. Following a completed audit or review, the Inspector General may perform a followup audit or review to determine what measures the High-Speed Rail Authority implemented to address the Inspector General’s findings and to assess the effectiveness of those measures. In considering what audits and reviews to perform, the Inspector General may consider input received from the Legislature, the Governor, and the High-Speed Rail Authority.

(b) The duties and responsibilities of the Inspector General
 shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Commencing with the project update report required pursuant to Section 185033.5 that is due on or before March 1, 2023, to conduct independent fiscal estimates and reviews of the High-Speed Rail Authority’s plans and estimates for project advancement and make findings of the reasonableness of those plans and estimates.

(2) Commencing with the project update report required pursuant to Section 185033.5 that is due on or before March 1, 2023, to monitor progress toward meeting the milestones toward the implementation of the successful completion of the Merced to Bakersfield segment of the project, consistent with subdivision (a).

(3) To conduct audits and investigations relating to delivery of the project.

(4) To identify best practices in the delivery of capital projects and recommend policies to enable the High-Speed Rail Authority to adopt these practices when practicable.

(5) To recommend policies promoting efficiency in the administration of programs and operations as part of any audit findings.

(6) To review the High-Speed Rail Authority process for considering proposed and executed change orders and to make any recommendations to ensure the process is appropriate for determining the merit and reasonableness of change orders.

(7) To review the High-Speed Rail Authority’s contracts and contracting practices to determine whether they are executed consistent with state and federal laws and policies and are conducted in a fair and reasonable manner, providing
 the state with valued services at reasonable cost.

(8) To review proposed agreements to ensure that they are in the best interest of the state, the High-Speed Rail Authority’s statutory mission, and state priorities.

(9) To review or investigate adherence to contract provisions, including, but not limited to, billing and invoicing requirements, of any public or private entity, including a High-Speed Rail Authority contractor, that receives project funds.

(c) The Inspector General shall not investigate personnel issues regarding employees of the High-Speed Rail Authority.

(d) Nothing in this division is intended to infringe upon the authority of
 the High-Speed Rail Authority’s own audits and controls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 53, Sec. 9.   (AB 173)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

187032.

(a) In connection with duties authorized pursuant to this division, the Office of the Inspector General may do any of the following:

(1) Administer oaths.

(2) Certify to all official acts.

(3) Receive and investigate complaints or information from any person concerning the existence of an activity constituting a violation of laws, rules, or regulations, or mismanagement, gross waste of funds, abuse of authority, or a substantial and specific danger to the public health and safety. Once a complaint or information has been received from an employee of the High-Speed Rail Authority or one of its contractors:

(A) The Inspector General shall not disclose the identity of the employee without the consent of the employee, unless the Inspector General determines that the disclosure is unavoidable during the course of the investigation or the disclosure is made to an official of the Department of Justice responsible for determining whether a prosecution should be undertaken.

(B) No action constituting a reprisal, or threat of reprisal, for making the complaint or providing the information may be taken by any employee of the High-Speed Rail Authority or one of its contractors in
 a position to take those actions, unless the complaint was made or the information was disclosed with the knowledge that it was false or with willful disregard for its truth or falsity.

(4) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, or documents in any medium, or for the making of oral or written sworn statements, in any interview conducted pursuant to duties authorized by this division.

(b) Any subpoena issued under this division extends as process to all parts of the state and may be served by any person authorized to serve process of courts of record or by any person designated for that purpose by the office. The person serving this process may receive compensation as is allowed by the office, not to exceed the fees prescribed by law for similar service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 53, Sec. 10.   (AB 173)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

187034.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Inspector General during regular business hours or at any other time determined necessary by the Inspector General shall have access to and authority to examine and reproduce any and all books, accounts, reports, vouchers, correspondence, files, documents, and other records, and to examine the bank accounts, moneys, or other property of the High-Speed Rail Authority in connection with duties authorized by this division. Any officer or employee of any agency or entity having these records or property in their possession or under their control shall permit access to, and examination and
 reproduction thereof consistent with the provisions of this division, upon the request of the Inspector General or the Inspector General’s authorized representative.

(b) The High-Speed Rail Authority shall ensure that the right-of-access provisions described in subdivision (a) are included in all of its contracts or amendments executed on or after July 1, 2024, in which project funds will be expended.

(c) Providing confidential information to the Inspector General pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, confidential information that is subject to a privilege, shall not constitute a waiver of that confidentiality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 5.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

187035.

(a) The Inspector General shall not destroy any papers or memoranda used to support a completed audit or review sooner than three years after the corresponding report is published or delivered pursuant to Section 187037.

(b) All books, papers, records, and correspondence of the office pertaining to its work are public records subject to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code and shall be filed at any of the regularly maintained offices of the Inspector General, except that none of the following items or papers of which these items are a part shall be released to the public by the Inspector General or the employees of the Inspector General:

(1) Personal papers and correspondence of any person providing assistance to the Inspector General for purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 187032 when that person has requested in writing that their papers and correspondence be kept private and confidential. Consistent with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 187032, those papers and correspondence shall become public records if the written request is withdrawn, or upon the order of the Inspector General.

(2) Papers, correspondence, memoranda, or any substantive information pertaining to any audit or review not completed.

(3) Papers, correspondence, or memoranda pertaining to any audit or review that has been completed, which papers, correspondence, or memoranda are not used in support of any report resulting from the audit or review.

(4) Any survey of public employees or contracted staff that the Inspector General determines should be kept confidential to deter retaliation if the employees or staff respond to the survey.

(5) Any record of an investigation conducted under this division, including, but not limited to, all investigative files and work product, except that the Inspector General, whenever the Inspector General determines it necessary to serve the interests of the state, may issue a public report of the results of an investigation that has substantiated a violation of laws, rules, or regulations, or mismanagement, gross waste of funds, abuse of authority, or a substantial and specific danger to the public health and safety. Except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 187032, the Inspector General may also release any findings or evidence supporting any findings
 resulting from an investigation conducted pursuant to this division whenever the Inspector General determines it necessary to serve the interests of the state.

(c) The restrictions on public disclosure described in subdivision (b) shall only apply to records in the possession or control of the Inspector General, and shall not alter the responsibility of any other state or local agency to comply with all applicable laws regarding the disclosure of public records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 6.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

187036.

It is a misdemeanor for the Inspector General or any employee or former employee of the Inspector General to divulge or make known in any manner not expressly permitted by law to any person not employed by the Inspector General any particulars of any record, document, or information the disclosure of which is restricted by law from release to the public. This prohibition is also applicable to any person who has been furnished a draft copy of any report for comment or review or any person or business entity that is contracting with or has contracted with the Inspector General and to the employees and former employees of that person or business entity or the employees of any state agency or public entity that has assisted the Inspector General in connection with duties authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 10.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

187037.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), upon completion of an audit or review conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 187030, the Inspector General shall do all of the following:

(1) Publish a complete report on its internet website.

(2) Provide, in compliance with policies developed by the Inspector General, notification of the published report to the Governor and the High-Speed Rail Authority.

(3) Submit a copy of the published report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) The Inspector General may hold a report, or a portion of a report, confidential for the period of time described in paragraph (3) if the Inspector General determines that the report, or a portion of the report, would describe or otherwise reveal weaknesses, including those involving information security, physical security, fraud detection controls, or pending litigation, that would pose a substantial and articulable risk to the project or to state operations if publicly disclosed.

(2) If the Inspector General makes a determination pursuant to paragraph (1), the Inspector General shall do all of the following:

(A) Make publicly available any reasonably segregable portion of the report that does not pose the substantial and articulable risk identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) Publicly disclose
 that a report, or a portion of the report, has been held confidential and provide the rationale for the determination.

(C) Deliver a confidential report, or a confidential portion of the report, that describes and makes recommendations to resolve the identified weaknesses to state officials with oversight of the project, which may include the executive director and board chair of the High-Speed Rail Authority, the chairs of the Assembly Committee on Transportation and the Senate Committee on Transportation, or the Governor. The report, or portion of the report, delivered pursuant to this subparagraph shall remain confidential only so long as the Inspector General determines that public disclosure would continue to pose the substantial and articulable risk identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Within 120 days after making a determination pursuant to paragraph (1), and at least
 every 120 days thereafter while a report, or a portion of a report, is held confidential, the Inspector General shall reassess whether continued confidentiality is warranted. Upon each reassessment, the Inspector General shall either publicly release the report, or the portion of the report, that is held confidential or issue a written determination explaining why continued confidentiality remains necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 7.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

187038.

(a) The Inspector General shall report at least annually to the Legislature and the Governor a summary of its findings, positive and negative, of any reviews, investigations, or audits published pursuant to
 Section 187037 at the beginning of each fiscal year and upon request of the Legislature or Governor. The summary shall be posted on the office’s internet website and otherwise made available to the public upon its release to the Legislature and the Governor. The summary shall include, but not be limited to, significant problems discovered by the office, and whether previous recommendations the office has made have been implemented.

(b) The Inspector General shall report annually to the Legislature and the Governor on findings related to the High-Speed Rail Authority’s planning and delivery of the project. This report shall include updates on the
 High-Speed Rail Authority’s efforts to remedy any identified findings, and whether any identified findings have been addressed.

(c) The Inspector General shall maintain a list of identified findings, and the status of the High-Speed Rail Authority’s efforts to address them, and shall post that list on the office’s internet website.

(d) Reports to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 8.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 25. RIVERSIDE COUNTY TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION [240000. - 240323.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions, Findings, and Definitions [240000. - 240004.]

240000.

The division shall be known and may be cited as the Riverside County Transportation Sales Tax Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Recognizing the scarcity of resources available for all transportation development, alternative methods of financing provided in this division are needed to finance the cost of constructing, developing, acquiring, and maintaining and providing highways, streets, roads, and public transportation services in the County of Riverside and these methods will increase economic opportunities, contribute to economic development, be in the public interest and serve a public purpose, and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens within the County of Riverside.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this division, that the County of Riverside continue to receive its equitable share of funds under the state transportation improvement program and that incentives be provided to reward rather than to penalize counties that adopt local sales tax measures.

(c) It is in the public interest to allow the voters of Riverside County to adopt a specific revenue source and to authorize new duties for the Riverside County Transportation Commission so that local decisions can be implemented in a timely manner to provide improvements to the transportation system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240002.

“Bonds” means indebtedness and securities of any kind or class, including bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, and commercial paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240003.

“Commission” means the Riverside County Transportation Commission created pursuant to Section 130054.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240004.

“County” means the County of Riverside.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Administration [240100. - 240103.]

240100.

The commission shall expend only that amount of the funds generated pursuant to this division for staff support, audit, administrative expenses, and contract services that are necessary and reasonable to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to this division. The commission shall not expend more than 1 percent of the funds received from the transactions and use tax levied pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 240300) for the salaries and benefits for the commission’s staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240101.

The commission shall do all of the following with respect to the revenues derived from the transactions and use tax levied pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 240300):

(a) Adopt an annual budget.

(b) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the commission and of all revenues expended pursuant to this division to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(c) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240102.

(a) The commission shall publish, pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, notice of the time and place of the public hearing for the adoption of the annual budget not later than 15 days prior to the date of the hearing. 

(b) The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240103.

The commission may approve a transaction and use tax ordinance and ballot proposition and call an election in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 240300).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Powers and Functions [240200. - 240203.]

240200.

The commission may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240201.

All claims for money or damages against the commission are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240202.

The commission may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, including, but not limited to, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and hold harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240203.

The commission may contract with any department or agency of the United States of America, with any public agency, including, but not limited to, the Department of Transportation, any transit development board, county, or city, or with any person upon any terms and conditions that the commission finds is in its best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Transactions and Use Tax [240300. - 240323.]

240300.

The Legislature, by the enactment of this chapter, intends the additional funds provided government agencies by this chapter to supplement existing local revenues being used for transportation purposes. The government agencies shall maintain their existing commitment of local funds for street, highway, and public transit purposes pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the commission to enforce this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240301.

The commission may levy a retail transactions and use tax applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of the county in accordance with this chapter and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The ordinance shall only become effective if adopted by a two-thirds vote of the commission and subsequently approved by two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure at a special election called for the purpose by the board of supervisors or at any regular election. The commission shall specify in the ordinance that not more than 1 percent of the annual net amount of revenues raised by the tax may be used to fund the salaries and benefits of the staff of the commission in administering the programs funded from that tax. The ordinance shall take effect at the close of the polls on the day of election at which the proposition is adopted. The initial collection of the transactions and use tax shall take place in accordance with Section 240304.

If the voters do not approve the ordinance, the board of supervisors may, at any time thereafter, submit the same, or a different, measure, if adopted by a two-thirds vote of the commission, to the voters in accordance with this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 343, Sec. 28.10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

240302.

(a) The commission, in the ordinance, shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed, the tax rate or the maximum tax rate, the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used, and shall set a term during which the tax will be imposed.

(b) The purposes for which the tax revenues may be used may include, but are not limited to, the administration of this division, including legal actions related thereto, the construction, capital acquisition, maintenance, and operation of streets, roads, highways, including state highways, and public transit systems. These purposes include expenditures for the planning, environmental reviews, engineering and design costs, and related right-of-way acquisition.

(c) The ordinance shall contain an expenditure plan which shall include the allocation of revenues for the purposes authorized by this section and shall include, at a minimum, the following provisions:

(1) The proportional distribution of the revenues among various purposes.

(2) The specific projects to be funded under the state highway and freeway portion.

(3) The formula for distribution of the city and county portion, which may be amended by voter approval.

(d) Following adoption of the ordinance by the voters, the expenditure plan may only be amended, if required, by the following process:

(1) Initiation of amendment by the commission, reciting findings of necessity. 

(2) Approval by the board of supervisors.

(3) Approval by a majority of the cities constituting a majority of the incorporated population.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240303.

(a) The county shall conduct an election called by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 240301.

(b) The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of elections by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240304.

(a) Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 120 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(b) Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, the commission shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240305.

The revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated by the commission for transportation purposes consistent with the adopted regional transportation improvement program and the regional transportation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240306.

(a) The commission, subject to the approval of the voters, may impose a maximum tax rate of 1.5 percent under this division and the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code). The commission shall only levy a tax or multiple taxes at a rate
 that is a multiple of 0.25 percent, unless a different rate is
 specifically authorized by statute. Neither this division nor the ordinance shall affect any tax otherwise authorized.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the tax rate authorized pursuant to this section shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit established by that section.

(c) The tax rate adopted pursuant to this chapter, unless otherwise prohibited, may be increased by the commission by ordinance adopted in the manner and by the vote stated in Section 240301 and approved by two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure at an election called for that purpose by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   (AB 1385)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

240307.

Any increase or reduction in the tax rate adopted pursuant to Section 240306 or 240307 shall become effective on the first day of the calendar quarter which commences at least 120 days following the date of the commission’s vote approving the increased or reduced rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240308.

(a) If requested to do so by the commission in its resolution calling for an election, the board of supervisors, as part of the ballot proposition to approve the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, may seek authorization to issue bonds for capital outlay expenditures as may be provided for in the ordinance expenditure plan payable from the proceeds of the tax.

(b) The maximum bonded indebtedness that may be outstanding at any one time shall be an amount equal to the sum of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, but not to exceed the estimated proceeds of the tax, as determined by the plan. The amount of bonds outstanding at any one time does not include the amount of bonds, refunding bonds, or bond
 anticipation notes for which funds necessary for the payment thereof have been set aside for that purpose in a trust or escrow account.

(c) The proposition shall set forth each of the following:

(1) The actual percent of the tax.

(2) The duration of the tax if the plan specifies a time limit.

(3) The amount of bonds, if any, payable from the proceeds of the tax.

(4) The commission as the agency imposing the tax.

(5) The appropriations limit of the commission, pursuant to Section 4 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(d) The
 sample ballot to be mailed to the voters, pursuant to Section 13303 of the Elections Code, shall be the full proposition, as set forth in the ordinance calling the election, and the voter information handbook shall include the entire ordinance expenditure plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 170.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

240309.

(a) The bonds authorized by the voters concurrently with the approval of the retail transactions and use tax may be issued at any time by the commission and shall be payable from the proceeds of the tax. The bonds shall be referred to as “limited tax bonds.”

The bonds may be secured by a pledge of revenues from the proceeds of the tax. 

(b) The pledge of the tax to the limited tax bonds authorized under this chapter shall have priority over the use of any of the tax for “pay-as-you-go” financing, except to the extent that that priority is expressly restricted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240310.

Limited tax bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time by a two-thirds vote of the commission. Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in the amounts as may be necessary, until the full amount of bonds authorized have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240311.

(a) A resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds shall state all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to, or connected with, the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(2) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(3) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(4) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not be beyond the date of termination of the imposition of the retail transactions and use tax.

(5) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed the maximum allowable by law.

(6) The denomination or denominations of the bonds, which shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(7) The form of the bonds, including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds, to the extent permitted by federal law, and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and the time when all of, or any part of, the principal becomes due and payable.

(b) The resolution may also contain any other matters authorized by this chapter or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240312.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding the maximum allowable by law, payable at intervals determined by the commission, except that the first interest payable on the bonds, or any series thereof, may be for any period not exceeding one year, as determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240313.

In the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, the commission may also provide for the call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at the times and prices and upon other terms as specified. However, no bond is subject to call or redemption prior to maturity, unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240314.

The principal of, and interest on, the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the commission, or at other places as may be designated, or at both the office and other places at the option of the holders of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

240315.
